Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 3. Commission Reports and Publications.

Administrative Code. —

For reports and recordkeeping, see 6 AAC 30, art. 8.

Sec. 18.80.150.
Annual report.

The commission shall report annually to the governor on civil rights problems it has encountered in the preceding year, and may recommend legislative action. The commission shall provide the Legislative Affairs Agency with 40 copies of the report during the week preceding the convening of the annual legislative session for library distribution. The commission shall make copies of the report available to the public and notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1978; am § 37 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to additional material and statistical data required to be included in the annual report prepared under this section for 2007 and 2008, see § 15, ch. 63, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.80.160.
Informative publications.

The commission may prepare and distribute pamphlets and press releases to inform the public of its constitutional and statutory civil rights.
The commission shall submit proposed publications to the Department of Law for a review of legal accuracy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1963)